Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community college” has the meaning given that term in ORS 341.005.
(b) “Public university” means a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(c) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs  shall develop and implement one or more con-
ditional grant programs statewide to expand campus veteran resource  centers on the cam-
puses of Oregon community colleges and public universities. The  purpose of the grant
programs is to augment existing campus programs that help veterans  successfully transition
from military service  to college life, succeed in college, complete educational goals and
transition from college to the workforce and the community.
(3)(a) The department shall award multiple one-time grants under this section  during the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, on a competitive basis to community colleges and public
universities based on proposals submitted  by the colleges and universities under subsection
(5) of this section that:
(A) Expand and enhance existing campus veteran resource centers on campus premises;
(B) Recruit and employ campus veteran resource coordinators who can serve as  liaisons
to provide advocacy, understanding and resource connections for veterans;
(C) Attract veterans to  enroll in and attend educational programs at community colleges
and public universities;
(D) Provide assistance, guidance  and support to veterans in completing educational goals
and objectives;
(E) Provide resources  to college administrations, faculty and staff to facilitate an
understanding and appreciation of  the strengths, unique challenges and needs of veterans
and their families;
(F) Refer campus  veterans to local county veterans’ service officers appointed under ORS
408.410 who assist veterans in obtaining federal and state veteran benefits;
(G) Assist veterans  in successfully transitioning to work and community life by con-
necting veterans with workforce and employment resources; and
(H) Provide resources and matching funds in an amount to  be determined by the de-
partment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-C) Page 1
(b) Grant recipients may use grant funds awarded under this section for  the expansion
and enhancement of existing campus veteran resource  center programs, including training
campus veteran coordinators, purchasing computer and other equipment and  supplies, hiring
additional staff, hosting veteran events, facilitating access to workforce and community re-
sources that were not previously available and meeting other identified needs  for the suc-
cessful and continued operation of the existing centers and coordinators.
(c) A grant recipient may use up to $25,000 of grant funds awarded under this  section to
pay a campus veteran  resource coordinator’s salary if the grant recipient commits to
matching at least 50 percent of grant funds used for that purpose.
(d) Grant recipients may not use grant funds awarded under this section  to duplicate
services provided by county veterans’ service officers appointed under ORS 408.410, as  de-
scribed in ORS 406.450. However, grant recipients may use grant funds awarded  under this
section to provide additional information and aid that is not available through county
veterans’ service officers.
(4) A community college or public university may submit a  grant proposal under sub-
section (5) of this section if the community college or public university:
(a) Is located in Oregon;
(b) Has an existing campus veteran resource center or has, or intends to  hire prior to
the distribution of grant funds, a campus veteran resource coordinator;
(c) Meets,  or intends to meet prior to the distribution of grant funds, a majority of the
criteria under subsection (3)(a) of this section; and
(d) Demonstrates its capacity to administer any funds awarded  under this section in
compliance with the requirements of this section and all applicable federal and state laws.
(5) A community college or public university that meets the requirements  of subsection
(4) of this section may apply for  grant funds under this section by submitting a grant pro-
posal to the department in the form determined by the department.
(6) When determining  which grant proposals to fund, the department shall make funds
available statewide and may:
(a) Give priority to those proposals that the department determines are  best designed to
help veterans successfully transition from military service to college life,  succeed in college,
complete educational goals and  transition from college to the workforce and the community;
or
(b) Concentrate funds and  resources in those areas of the state with the greatest need
for veteran assistance programs, as determined by the department.
(7)(a) The department shall award grant  funds to a successful applicant in an amount
equal to the least of:
(A) The amount supported by the applicant’s application;
(B) $100,000; or
(C) Any other amount  determined by the department to further the purpose of the grant
program.
(b) The department shall issue a grant award letter to the applicant setting  forth a grant
recipient’s reporting requirements under subsection (8) of this section  and describing the
restrictions on the use of grant  funds under subsection (3) of this section and as may be
determined by the department.
(c) The grant recipient may  not use grant funds for purposes other than those designated
by the department in the recipient’s award letter.
(8) Within 30  days after the end of each calendar quarter, each grant recipient shall
provide a program report to the department. The  quarterly report must include a narrative
of the following:
(a) Summary of program activities;
(b) Description of program successes;
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-C) Page 2
(c) Discussion  of challenges the grant recipient has encountered implementing the pro-
gram;
(d) Accounting of how grant funds have been used; and
(e) Any other information the department requires.
(9) The  department may collaborate with the Higher Education Coordinating Commission
in developing and implementing the programs established under this section.
(10) The department may solicit and accept gifts,  grants and donations from public and
private sources to further the purposes of this section.
(11) The department shall adopt rules that prescribe:
(a) The  procedures for the grant application process, including grant review and ap-
proval;
(b) Grant recipient reporting requirements;
(c) Measurable goals and outcome requirements;
(d) Allowable uses of grant funds;
(e) Procedures for disbursement of grant funds;
(f) Recordkeeping requirements; and
(g) Any additional procedures the department  determines necessary to implement the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,187,194 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the veterans’ services fund estab-
lished under Article  XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution, to the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs for the  purpose of implementing and administering grant programs to ex-
pand campus veteran resource centers under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
No later than August 31, 2018, the  Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall
report to the interim legislative committees relating to veterans on  the implementation of
the grant programs  established under section 1 of this 2017 Act and on further steps required
to expand the programs during the 2019-2021 biennium. The department shall report in  the
manner provided by ORS 192.245 and may include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 4. No later than  September 15, 2018, the Advisory Committee appointed under
ORS 406.210 shall review and consider the grant programs established under section 1 of this
2017 Act, including the quarterly reports submitted by  the grant recipients under section 1
(8) of this 2017 Act and the report prepared by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs  under
section 3 of this 2017 Act, and report to the  interim legislative committees relating to vet-
erans. The Advisory Committee shall  evaluate the merits of the grant programs, how grants
were awarded to community colleges and public universities and how grant  funds were used
by grant recipients. The report must address funding priorities for implementation of  legis-
lation that will accomplish one or more of the purposes and objectives of this  2017 Act and
make recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 5. Sections 1 to 4 of this 2017 Act are repealed on January 2, 2020.
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-C) Page 3
Passed by Senate April 18, 2017
Repassed by Senate June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-C) Page 4